Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5788.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1307. (1) By the processing deadline, the department shall approve or deny an application for a permit. (2) If requested by the permit applicant, the department shall extend the processing period for a permit by not more than 120 days, as specified by the permit applicant. If requested by the permit applicant, the department may extend the processing period beyond the additional 120 days. However, a processing period shall must not be extended under this subsection to a date later than 1 year after the application period ends. (3) A processing period is tolled from the date that a permit applicant submits a petition under section 1315(1) until the date that a decision of the director is made under section 1315(6). If a permit applicant submits a petition under section 1315(1), the department shall not approve or deny the application for the permit under subsection (1) until after the director issues a decision under section 1315(6). (4) The approval or denial of an application for a permit shall application must be in writing, and shall be based upon on evidence that would meet the standards in section 75 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.275, and supported by written findings of fact. (5) Approval of an a permit application for a permit may be granted with conditions or modifications necessary to achieve compliance with the part or parts of this act under which the permit is issued. (6) The department shall consider all of the following factors in determining whether to approve or deny a permit application for a new, expanded, or materially modified facility that may reasonably result in off-site environmental or public health impacts: (a) Any resolution, policy, or rule adopted by the governing body of a county, city, or township where the proposed activity would occur. Consideration of a resolution, policy, or rule adopted by the governing body of a county, city, or township under this subdivision does not confer to a county, city, or township veto authority over a permit decision. (b) Any public comments, petitions, or hearing testimony regarding a proposed activity provided by the county, city, or township where the proposed activity would occur. Consideration of a resolution, policy, or rule adopted by the governing body of a county, city, or township under this subdivision does not confer to a county, city, or township veto authority over a permit decision. (c) Whether a proposed activity will have a disproportionate environmental or public health impact on a nearby community, including, but not limited to, a community that already experiences a significant environmental burden. As used in this subdivision, "disproportionate environmental or public health impact" means an impact that exceeds any impacts borne by a community as described in this subdivision, as demonstrated by reliable data, mapping tools, or peer-reviewed studies in the administrative record. (d) Whether a proposed activity is consistent with the protection of public health, safety, and welfare, and the environment. (e) Whether the administrative record demonstrates that the department's approval of a permit would result in a significant adverse impact. As used in this subdivision, "significant adverse impact" means an adverse impact to public health, safety, or welfare, or the environment. (f) The cumulative environmental impact of a proposed activity based on the proposed activity's environmental assessment materials. A cumulative environmental impact analysis must be limited to any impacts reasonably related to the proposed activity and supported by information available in the administrative record. (g) The proposed activity's proximity to sensitive receptors, including, but not limited to, child care facilities, hospitals, senior care facilities, residential neighborhoods, public parks, bodies of water, and drinking water sources. (7) The department may deny a permit application due to, or condition the approval of a permit application on the mitigation of, any of the factors listed under subsection (6)(c) to (g). (8) (6) A denial of an application for a permit or, for a permit under part 301 or 303, an approval with modification of an application for a permit shall must document, and any review upholding the denial or modification shall must determine, to the extent practical, all of the following: (a) That the decision is based on specifically cited provisions of this act or rules promulgated under this act. (b) That the decision is based upon on sufficient facts or data, which are recorded in the file. (c) To the extent applicable, all of the following: (i) That the decision is the product of reliable scientific principles and methods. (ii) That the decision has applied the scientific principles and methods reliably to the facts. (d) That the decision is consistent with the protection of public health, safety, and welfare, and the environment based on the administrative record, technical evidence, and public comments. (e) (d) In the case of denial of an application for a permit under part 301 or 303, suggestions on changes to allow the permit to be approved. (9) (7) Except for permits described in subsection (8), (10), if the department fails to satisfy the requirements of subsection (1) with respect to an application for a permit, the department shall pay the permit applicant an amount equal to 15% of the greater of the following, as applicable: (a) The amount of the application fee for that permit. (b) If an assessment or other fee is charged on an annual or other periodic basis by the department to a person holding the permit for which the application was submitted, the amount of the first periodic charge of that assessment or other fee for that permit. (10) A payment under subsection (9) does not relieve the department of the department's obligation to fully comply with the substantive and procedural requirements of this act. (11) (8) If the department fails to satisfy the requirements of subsection (1) with respect to a permit required by section 11509, 11512, 30304, or 32603, the application shall be is considered to be approved and the department shall be is considered to have made any determination required for approval. This subsection does not apply to permits that are subject to a public hearing or extended public comment period under this section. (12) (9) The failure of the department to satisfy the requirements of subsection (1) or the fact that the department is required to make a payment under subsection (7) (9) or is considered to have approved a permit under subsection (8) shall (11) must not be used by the department as the basis for discriminating against the permit applicant. If the department is required to make a payment under subsection (7), (9), the application shall must be processed in sequence with other applications for the same type of permit, based on the date on which the processing period began, unless the director determines on an application-by-application basis that the public interest is best served by processing in a different order. (13) (10) If the department fails to satisfy the requirements of subsection (1) with respect to 10% or more of the applications for a particular type of permit received during a quarter of the state fiscal year, the department shall immediately devote resources from that program to eliminate any backlog and satisfy the requirements of subsection (1) with respect to new applications for that type of permit within the next fiscal quarter. (14) (11) If the department fails to satisfy the requirements of subsection (1), the director shall notify the appropriations committees of the senate and house of representatives of the failure. The notification shall must be in writing and shall must include both of the following: (a) An explanation of the reason for the failure. (b) A statement of the amount the department was required to pay the permit applicant under subsection (7) (9) or a statement that the department was required to consider the application to be approved under subsection (8), (11), as applicable. (15) If a permit is not otherwise the subject of public notice, a public comment period, or a public hearing under this act, the department shall provide public notice, a public comment period, and a public hearing before approving or denying the permit. The department shall provide public notice, a public comment period, and a public hearing as follows: (a) Public notice must be provided by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the area of the permit's proposed activity or in a state publication designed to give general public notice, and by other means determined to be necessary by the department to assure adequate public notice. The department shall also post public notice on the department's website. (b) The public notice must identify all of the following: (i) The proposed activity involved in the permit action. (ii) The name and address of the responsible official. (iii) The mailing address of the department. (iv) The name, address, and telephone number of a representative of the department from whom an interested person may obtain additional information, including a copy of the draft permit, the application, and any other materials available to the department that are relevant to the permit decision. (v) A brief description of the public comment period procedure. (vi) The time and place of the public hearing. (c) The public comment period must be not less than 30 days. (d) The department shall give notice of the public hearing not less than 30 days before the public hearing. (e) Not less than 30 days before the public comment period begins, the department shall make available to the public all of the following: (i) The permit application draft. (ii) Environmental assessments. (iii) Technical reports. (iv) Any other supporting documents. (f) This subsection does not apply to a permit renewal or modification that does not materially change the scope, capacity, or environmental impact of the permitted activity. (16) The department shall prepare a written responsiveness summary that must address all substantive issues that are relevant to the permit decision raised during a public comment period. The department shall make the written responsiveness summary available to the public along with a final permit decision. (17) The department shall keep a record of the commenters and the issues raised during a public comment period and at the public hearing, and these records must be available to the public. (18) The department shall maintain a complete administrative record for each permit decision. The administrative record must include, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The permit application. (b) Technical reports. (c) Public comments. (d) Hearing transcripts, if applicable. (e) The department's written findings. (19) The participation of a local unit of government under this section is optional. Nothing in this section requires a local unit of government to expend funds or perform duties beyond existing law. Sec. 11125. (1) Upon On receipt of an operating license application that complies with the requirements of section 11123(2), the department shall do all of the following: (a) Notify the municipality and county in which the treatment, storage, or disposal facility is located or proposed to be located; a local soil erosion and sedimentation control agency appointed pursuant to part 91; each division within the department that has responsibility in land, air, or water management; a regional planning agency established by executive directive of the governor; and other appropriate agencies. The notice shall must describe the procedure by which the license may be approved or denied. (b) Review The department shall review the plans of the proposed treatment, storage, or disposal facility to determine if the proposed operation complies with this part and the rules promulgated under this part. The review shall be made within the department. The review shall must include, but need is not be limited to, a review of air quality, water quality, waste management, hydrogeology, and the applicant's disclosure statement. A written and signed review by each person within the department reviewing the application and plans shall must be received and filed in the department's license application records before an operating license is issued or denied by the department. (c) Integrate the relevant provisions of all permits that the applicant is required to obtain from the department to construct the proposed treatment, storage, or disposal facility into the operating license required by this part. (d) Consider the mitigation measures proposed to be implemented as identified in section 11123(2)(m). (e) Hold a public hearing not more than 60 days after receipt of the application. (2) The department may establish operating license conditions specifically applicable to the treatment, storage, or disposal facility and operation at that site to mitigate adverse impacts. (3) The department shall provide public notice, and an opportunity for a public comment period, and a public hearing as described in subsection (12) before making a final decision on an operating license application. (4) The department shall make a final decision on an operating license application within not later than 140 days after the department receives a complete application. However, if the state's hazardous waste management program is authorized by the United States environmental protection agency Environmental Protection Agency under section 3006 of subtitle C of the solid waste disposal act, 42 USC 6926, the department may extend the deadline beyond the limitation provided in this section in order to fulfill the public participation requirements of the solid waste disposal act. The operating license may contain stipulations specifically applicable to site and operation. (5) A local ordinance, permit, or other requirement shall must not prohibit the operation of a licensed treatment, storage, or disposal facility. (6) If any information required to be included in the disclosure statement required under section 11123 changes or is supplemented after the filing of the statement, the applicant or licensee shall provide that information to the department in writing within not later than 30 days after the change or addition. (7) The department shall consider all of the following factors in determining whether to approve or deny a license application for a proposed treatment, storage, or disposal facility: (a) Any resolution, policy, or rule adopted by the governing body of a county, city, or township where the proposed treatment, storage, or disposal facility would be based. Consideration of a resolution, policy, or rule adopted by the governing body of a county, city, or township under this subdivision does not confer to a county, city, or township veto authority over a licensing decision. (b) Any public comments, petitions, or hearing testimony regarding a proposed activity provided by the county, city, or township where the proposed treatment, storage, or disposal facility would be based. Consideration of a resolution, policy, or rule adopted by the governing body of a county, city, or township under this subdivision does not confer to a county, city, or township veto authority over a licensing decision. (c) Whether a proposed treatment, storage, or disposal facility will have a disproportionate environmental or public health impact on a nearby community, including, but not limited to, a community that already experiences a significant environmental burden. As used in this subdivision, "disproportionate environmental or public health impact" means an impact that exceeds an impact borne by a community as described in this subdivision, as demonstrated by reliable data, mapping tools, or peer-reviewed studies in the administrative record. (d) Whether a proposed treatment, storage, or disposal facility is consistent with the protection of public health, safety, and welfare, and the environment. (e) Whether the administrative record demonstrates that the department's approval of a license application would result in a significant adverse impact. As used in this subdivision, "significant adverse impact" means an adverse impact to public health, safety, or welfare, or the environment. (f) The cumulative environmental impact of a proposed treatment, storage, or disposal facility based on the applicable environmental assessment materials. A cumulative environmental impact analysis must be limited to any impacts reasonably related to the proposed treatment, storage, or disposal facility and supported by information available in the administrative record. (g) The proposed treatment, storage, or disposal facility's proximity to sensitive receptors, including, but not limited to, child care facilities, hospitals, senior care facilities, residential neighborhoods, public parks, bodies of water, or drinking water sources. (8) The department may deny a license application due to, or condition the approval of a license application on the mitigation of, any of the factors listed under subsection (7)(c) to (g). (9) (7) The department may deny an operating license application submitted pursuant to section 11123 if any information described in section 11123(2)(k)(ii) to (iv) was not disclosed as required in section 11123(2) or this section. (10) (8) The department shall provide notice of the final decision to persons on the organized mailing list for the facility. (11) (9) Following the construction of a new, expanded, enlarged, or altered treatment, storage, or disposal facility, the department shall review all information required to be submitted by the operating license. If the department finds that the owner or operator has deviated from the specific conditions established in the operating license, the department shall determine if cause exists for modification or revocation of the operating license, in accordance with provisions established by rule. At a minimum, the postconstruction documentation shall must include all of the following: (a) Updated disclosure information or a certification as described in section 11123(2)(n)(i). (b) A certification of construction as described in section 11123(2)(n)(ii). The department shall require additional certification periodically during the operation or in order to verify proper closure of the site. (c) A certification of capability signed and sealed by a licensed professional engineer as described in section 11123(2)(n)(iii). (d) Information regarding any deviations from the specific conditions in the operating license. (e) Proof of financial responsibility. (12) The department shall provide public notice, a public comment period, and a public hearing under subsection (3) as follows: (a) Public notice must be provided by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the area of the license application's proposed treatment, storage, or disposal facility or in a state publication designed to give general public notice, and by other means determined to be necessary by the department to ensure adequate public notice. The department shall also post public notice on the department's website. (b) The public notice must identify all of the following: (i) The proposed treatment, storage, or disposal facility underlying the license application. (ii) The name and address of the responsible official. (iii) The mailing address of the department. (iv) The name, address, and telephone number of a representative of the department from whom an interested person may obtain additional information, including a copy of the license application and any other materials available to the department that are relevant to the license application decision. (v) A brief description of the public comment period procedure. (vi) The time and place of the public hearing. (c) The public comment period must be not less than 30 days. (d) The department shall give notice of the public hearing not less than 30 days before the public hearing. (e) Not less than 30 days before the public comment period begins, the department shall make available to the public all of the following: (i) The license application draft. (ii) Environmental assessments. (iii) Technical reports. (iv) Any other supporting documents. (13) The department shall prepare a written responsiveness summary that addresses all substantive issues that are relevant to the permit decision raised during a public comment period. The department shall make the written responsiveness summary available to the public along with a final license application decision. (14) The department shall keep a record of the commenters and the issues raised during the public comment period and at the public hearing, and these records must be available to the public. (15) The department shall maintain a complete administrative record for each permit decision. The administrative record must include, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) The license application. (b) Technical reports. (c) Public comments. (d) Hearing transcripts, if applicable. (e) The department's written findings. (16) The participation of a local unit of government under this section is optional. Nothing in this section requires a local unit of government to expend funds or perform duties beyond existing law.